Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.578

Opioid and fentanyl prevention education—Medication through standing order.

(1) Each public and private institution of higher education shall provide opioid and fentanyl prevention education and awareness information to all students. Education may be offered in person or electronically and must include information on the "good samaritan" statute in RCW 69.50.315. This education must be posted on each institution's public website for students, parents, and legal guardians to view.

(2) Naloxone and fentanyl strips must be made available to students on campus in various accessible locations such as student wellness centers, student union buildings, and student housing.

(3) Institutions of higher education must provide staff working in residence halls education and training on administering naloxone.

(4) For the purpose of assisting a person at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose, an institution of higher education may obtain and maintain opioid overdose reversal medication through a standing order prescribed and dispensed in accordance with RCW 69.41.095.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.

[ 2024 c 211 s 1.]